Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,112
Taxes, interest, and penalties; disposition.

All taxes, interest, and penalties collected under the Compressed Fuel Tax Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Highway Trust Fund or Highway Cash Fund as appropriate.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 16.